apertium-es-ast.es.dix
  <pardef n="agreg/ar__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aríamos</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aría</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aríais</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arías</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arían</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aría</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aremos</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aré</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aréis</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arás</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arán</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ará</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áremos</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>are</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>areis</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ares</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aren</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>are</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ando</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ándo</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabiéndo"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>amos</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ué</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>asteis</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aste</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aron</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ó</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ad</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
      <p>
        <l>os</l>
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ad</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabed"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabé"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ád</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabéd"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ar</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ar</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__saber"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ár</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabér"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ábamos</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aba</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>abais</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>abas</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aban</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aba</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áramos</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ásemos</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ara</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ase</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arais</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>aseis</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aras</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ases</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aran</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>asen</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ara</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ase</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>adas</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ada</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ados</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ado</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ado</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>amos</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áis</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>

<e><i>coalig</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>agreg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>ahog</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>alarg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>alberg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>aleg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>amarg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>apag</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>apeg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>arriesg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>arrug</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>cabalg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>carg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>castig</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>catalog</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>congreg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>desahog</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>descarg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>dialog</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>divulg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>encarg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>entreg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>fatig</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>fug</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>hurg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>indag</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>interrog</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>investig</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>juzg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>larg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>leg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>lig</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>lleg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>madrug</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>naufrag</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>naveg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>oblig</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>otorg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>pag</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>peg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>posterg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>prodig</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>prolog</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>prolong</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>promulg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>propag</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>prorrog</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>recarg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>releg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>salg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>subyug</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>sufrag</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>trag</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>veng</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR"><i>rezag</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="llegar a ser">
  <i>lleg</i>
  <par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/>
  <p>
     <l><b/>a<b/>ser</l>
     <r><g><b/>a<b/>ser</g></r>
  </p>
</e>
<e><i>drag</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>diptong</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>encabalg</i><par n="agreg/ar__vblex"/></e>
